District of Columbia statutes.
7-504.08

Compensation; expenses.

All members shall serve without compensation, but expenses incurred by the Commission as a whole, or by its individual members, when duly authorized, will become an obligation against appropriate District government and federal funds designated for that purpose.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title IV, § 408, 22 DCR 2462
1981 Ed., § 6-2228.
1973 Ed., § 6-1728.